Montana, session 2025, SB433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Rotary traffic islands and roundabouts -- definitions. (1) A vehicle passing around a
rotary traffic island or a roundabout:
(a) may be driven only to the right of the island or to the right of the center of the roundabout; and
(b) has right-of-way over all vehicles approaching the island or roundabout.
(2) (a) A vehicle approaching a rotary traffic island or a roundabout must yield the right-of-way to
all vehicles passing around the island or roundabout.
(b) A vehicle approaching a roundabout may not enter the roundabout in a manner that interferes
with the travel of a towing vehicle simultaneously entering the roundabout.
(3) (a) If the approach to a rotary traffic island or roundabout has multiple lanes of traffic for travel
in the same direction, a towing vehicle may, with due regard for all other traffic and when employing a turn
signal or hazard signal, deviate from its lane in order to safely approach or pass around the island or
roundabout. Vehicles travelling in the same direction as the hauling vehicle must yield the right-of-way and may
not attempt to pass.
(b) If a towing vehicle is poised to enter a roundabout simultaneously with a second towing vehicle,
the vehicle to the left has the right-of-way and the vehicle to the right shall yield.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Roundabout" means a circular intersection.
(b) "Towing vehicle" means a vehicle that is towing one or more vehicles.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 433
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 433
Section 2. Section 61-8-327, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-8-327. One-way roadways, rotary traffic islands, and roundabouts. (1) The department of
transportation or a local authority may designate a highway, roadway, part of a roadway, or specific lanes under
its respective jurisdiction for one-way traffic and shall erect official traffic control devices giving notice of that
designation.
(2) Upon On a roadway designated by official traffic control devices for one-way traffic, a vehicle
may be driven only in the direction designated.
(3) A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island or a roundabout may be driven only to the right
of the island or the center of the roundabout.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a "roundabout" is a circular intersection where all entering
traffic must yield to the vehicles within the intersection."
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
61, chapter 8, part 3, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 8, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 433
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 433, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 433
INTRODUCED BY T. MANZELLA
AN ACT REVISING RIGHT-OF-WAY LAWS REGARDING ROUNDABOUTS; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS; AND
AMENDING SECTION 61-8-327, MCA.”